North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-12.4 Nurse Licensure Compact
A party state’s withdrawal or termination does not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or terminated state’s licensing board to report adverse actions and significant investigations occurring prior to the effective date of such withdrawal or termination.

5.

This compact may not be construed to invalidate or prevent any nurse licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state and a nonparty state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of this compact.

6.

This compact may be amended by the party states. An amendment to this compact does not become effective and binding upon the party states unless and until it is enacted into the laws of all party states.

7.

Representatives of nonparty states to this compact must be invited to participate in the activities of the commission, on a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of this compact by all states.

ARTICLE XI
— CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

This compact must be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact are severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States, or if the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance may not be affected thereby. If this compact is held to be contrary to the constitution of any party state, this compact remains in full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable matters.

The term “head of the state licensing board” as used to define the compact administrator in subdivision a of subsection 2 of article VII means the executive director of the state board of nursing.